North Dakota, session 69, HB1004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the state
auditor for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the state auditor, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $14,627,899 $469,987 $15,097,886
New and vacant FTE pool 0 626,476 626,476
Operating expenses 1,719,771 156,166 1,875,937
Information technology consultants 450,000 135,000 585,000
Total all funds $16,797,670 $1,387,629 $18,185,299
Less other funds 6,486,821 (478,481) 6,008,340
Total general fund $10,310,849 $1,866,110 $12,176,959
Full-time equivalent positions 65.00 (6.00) 59.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One - Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total Funds
Cost related to new FTE $0 $3,000 $3,000
Peer review 25,000 0 25,000
Audit software migration 25,200 10,800 36,000
Grand total $50,200 $13,800 $64,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The state
auditor may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in section 1 of this
Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the new and vacant
FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the guidelines and reporting
provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 54-10-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-10-10. Salary of state auditor.
The annual salary of the state auditor is one hundred thirty thousand one hundred thirty - nine
thousand two hundred fifty - six dollars through June 30, 20242026, and one hundred thirty-five thousand
two hundred one hundred forty - three thousand four hundred thirty - four dollars thereafter.

H. B. NO. 1004 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1004.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 1 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State